Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2911.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-27.3-108.1.4 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled
"State Building Code" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-108.1.4. Inspections.
(a) The building official or the alternate building official appointed pursuant to § 23-27.3-
107.2, shall make all of the required inspections, or he or she may accept reports of inspections
from a qualified registered professional engineer or architect or others certified by the committee
and all reports of the inspections shall be in writing, or the building official may engage such experts
as he or she may deem necessary to report upon unusual technical issues that may arise.
(b) The building official or the alternate building official appointed pursuant to § 23-27.3-
107.2, shall make all of the required inspections in a timely manner and if, required inspections are
not completed within twenty (20) calendar days after receiving notification from the property owner
or contractor, the property owner or contractor may utilize the services of an independent building
inspector that is qualified under this chapter to conduct the required inspections.
(c) If the property owner or contractor utilizes the services of an independent building
inspector pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, the building official or
alternate building official, shall be required to accept the findings of the independent building
inspector.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005516
========
LC005516 - Page 2 of 3